Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 13 Polling Place Regulations During Voting Hours

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 298 to 304.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 308 to 320.

§ 22-13-101.
Poll hours; opening proclamation.

Polls shall be open at seven (7:00) a.m. and close at seven (7:00) p.m., local time. A judge of election shall proclaim aloud at seven (7:00) a.m. at the polls that the polls are open.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-185; Laws 1985, ch. 60, § 1.

Irregularity in keeping polls open. —

Where it was neither alleged nor proved for whom votes were cast, irregularity in keeping polls open until after 9 p.m., during which time 14 or more votes were cast, where polls should have closed at 7 p.m., as required by this section, did not furnish ground of contest unless it must be deemed to have materially affected result. Hamilton v. Marshall, 41 Wyo. 157, 282 P. 1058,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1929).

§ 22-13-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to qualification of electors, see art. 6, §§ 1 to 10, Wyo. Const.

As to statutory qualifications, see §

22-3-102

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to who may vote.

§ 22-13-103.
Preservation of order; privacy of voting booths and machines.

Judges of election have the duty and authority to preserve order at the polls by any necessary and suitable means.

To protect the privacy of the voter, voting booths and voting machines shall be kept clear of all persons except voters marking ballots and election officials discharging their duties.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-187; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), substituted “To protect the privacy of the voter” for “Except where physically impossible, a space of twenty (20) feet around.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) deleted “and challengers acting under legal authority” and made related changes.

§ 22-13-104.
Procedure before elector permitted to vote.

Before a qualified elector is permitted to vote an election judge shall record the applicable information as listed in W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxiii) by his name on the poll list.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 110, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 110, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-188; Laws 1991, ch. 243, §§ 2, 5; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to absentee voting generally, see §§

22-9-101

to

22-9-125

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “an election judge shall record the applicable information as listed in W.S. 22-1-202(a)(xxiii)” for “a judge of an election may enter the following notations”; repealed former (a)(i) through (a)(v), providing the specific notations to be entered on a poll list; and repealed former (b), providing that person who wishes to vote at an election whose name does not appear on the precinct list may vote as a challenged elector.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “22-1-102(a)(xxiii)” for “22-1-202(a)(xxiii)”.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 22-13-105.
Official marking of paper and absentee ballots.

Before delivering a paper ballot to an elector a judge of election or county clerk shall initial the ballot. No other identifying marks shall be made on an official ballot. An elector shall cast only one (1) ballot or set of ballots at each election. No ballot determined to be valid by the canvassing board shall be rejected solely due to an administrative error of not initialing the ballot.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-189; 2011, ch. 38, § 1; 2013 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to absentee voting generally, see §§

22-9-101

to

22-9-125

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote the section, which read: “Before delivering a paper ballot to an elector or voting an absentee ballot in a voting machine precinct, a judge of election shall mark the ballot with the official ballot stamp on the back and near the top of the ballot. In the blank spaces in the stamped imprint the judge shall fill in the election district and precinct numbers, the name of the county, the date, and the initials of the judge. No other identifying marks shall be made on an official ballot. An elector shall cast only one (1) ballot or set of ballots at each election.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence.

§ 22-13-106.
Marking and depositing of paper ballots.

Upon receiving a paper ballot, an elector shall proceed alone directly to a voting booth and there mark the ballot. The ballot shall then immediately be placed in the ballot box by the elector or judge of election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-190; 2008, ch. 115, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted the former second sentence which read: “After being marked, the paper ballots shall be folded with the face concealed and the official endorsement visible.”

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

§ 22-13-107.
Spoiled ballots.

An elector spoiling a paper ballot by mistake or accident may receive another ballot by returning the rejected ballot to a judge of election. Spoiled ballots shall immediately be cancelled by a judge of election and delivered with the returns to the county clerk or official conducting the election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-191; 2011, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

For another provision concerning spoiled ballots, see §

22-11-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “not more than twice” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 22-13-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which was derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-192; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2, related to voter slips.

§ 22-13-109.
Instruction in use of voting machine.

Before entering the voting booth, an elector desiring instruction on the use of the machine may summon two (2) judges of different political parties. The judges shall instruct on use of the machine but may not attempt to influence the vote. They may not remain in the booth after the elector has entered. A voting machine or other device may be used in the polling place solely for instruction purposes.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-193; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-13-110.
Entering write-in votes.

Write-in votes may be entered on a voting machine in the manner indicated by instructions posted on the voting booth or indicated on the voting machine.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-194; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

added “or indicated on the voting machine” at the end.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Statutory requirement for marking cross after name of write-in candidate is mandatory,

if and when the statutory requirement of instructing the voter to that effect has been complied with. Fisher v. Clissold, 398 P.2d 553,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1965).

And such instruction must be followed if given. —

The supreme court does not say it is unnecessary for a voter to make a mark after a name he has written in, in order for his vote to count, if a voting instruction to that effect has been given in accordance with this section. Fisher v. Clissold, 398 P.2d 553,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1965).

But voter following instruction to write in name should not be disfranchised. —

A voter should not be disfranchised and his obvious intent ignored, where he has followed the instruction given by writing the name of the candidate for whom he wants to vote. Fisher v. Clissold, 398 P.2d 553,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1965).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Elections: validity of state or local legislative ban on write-in votes, 69 ALR4th 948.

§ 22-13-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which was derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-195; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2, related to procedure after elector votes on machine.

§ 22-13-112.
Voting machine malfunction.

Voting machines failing to function during voting hours shall be immediately repaired or replaced, as determined by the county clerk or other authority conducting the election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-196.

§ 22-13-113.
Persons permitted in voting booth; time limit.

Not more than one (1) person may occupy a voting booth at any time, except that any elector who requires assistance to vote because of blindness, disability or inability to read or write may be given assistance by a person of the elector’s choice, other than the elector’s employer or an agent of that employer or an officer or agent of the elector’s union.

A person may remain in the booth for not more than ten (10) minutes.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-197; Laws 1985, ch. 48, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2.

§ 22-13-114.
Papers to assist marking permitted.

An elector may use a written or printed paper to assist in marking his ballot.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-198.

§ 22-13-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to absentee voting generally, see §§

22-9-101

to

22-9-125

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to absentee ballots in paper ballot elections.

§ 22-13-116.
[Repealed.]

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-200; Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 36, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to judges not leaving polls.

Laws 2009, ch. 36, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2009.

§ 22-13-117.
Announcement that polls will close; electors allowed to vote; proclamation of closing.

At 6:30 p.m. the judges of election shall announce that the polls will close in thirty (30) minutes. Electors present and waiting to vote at 7:00 p.m. shall be permitted to enter the polls and vote. No other elector shall be admitted to vote after 7:00 p.m. After all ballots are cast, the polls shall be declared closed by a judge of election making an official proclamation of closing.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-201.

§ 22-13-118.
Judges work schedule.

At the discretion of the county clerk, election judges may be allowed to work at the polling place on election day for a period of time less than the total amount of time the polls are open provided the polling place has a sufficient number of election judges on duty at all times to comply with the requirements of this title. An election judge shall not leave his polling place during his work shift.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 36, § 1; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling place” for “polling premise” and
“polling station place.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 36, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2009.